Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 6. Default.
Sec. 45.29.623.
Right to redeem collateral.

A debtor, a secondary obligor, or other secured party or lienholder may redeem collateral.

To redeem collateral, a person shall tender

fulfillment of all obligations secured by the collateral; and

the reasonable expenses and attorney fees described in AS

45.29.615(a)(1)

.

A redemption may occur at any time before a secured party has

collected collateral under AS

45.29.607

;

disposed of collateral or entered into a contract for its disposition under AS

45.29.610

; or

accepted collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures under AS

45.29.622

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.624.
Waiver.

A debtor or secondary obligor may waive the right to notification of disposition of collateral under AS

45.29.611

only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

A debtor may waive the right to require disposition of collateral under AS

45.29.620(e)

only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

Except in a consumer goods transaction, a debtor or secondary obligor may waive the right to redeem collateral under AS

45.29.623

only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.625.
Remedies for secured party’s failure to comply with chapter.

If it is established that a secured party is not proceeding in accordance with this chapter, a court may order or restrain collection, enforcement, or disposition of collateral on appropriate terms and conditions.

Subject to (c), (d), and (f) of this section, a person is liable for damages in the amount of any loss caused by a failure to comply with this chapter. Loss caused by a failure to comply may include loss resulting from the debtor’s inability to obtain, or increased costs of, alternative financing.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.628

,

a person who, at the time of the failure, was a debtor or an obligor or held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral may recover damages under (b) of this section for its loss; and

if the collateral is consumer goods, a person who was a debtor or secondary obligor at the time a secured party failed to comply with AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

may recover for that failure in any event an amount not less than the credit service charge plus 10 percent of the principal amount of the obligation or the time-price differential plus 10 percent of the cash price.

A debtor whose deficiency is eliminated under AS

45.29.626

may recover damages for the loss of any surplus. However, a debtor or secondary obligor whose deficiency is eliminated or reduced under AS

45.29.626

may not otherwise recover under (b) of this section for noncompliance with the provisions of AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance.

In addition to damages recoverable under (b) of this section, the debtor, consumer obligor, or person named as a debtor in a filed record, as applicable, may recover $500 in each case from a person that

fails to comply with AS

45.29.208

;

fails to comply with AS

45.29.209

;

files a record that the person is not entitled to file under AS

45.29.509(a)

;

fails to cause the secured party of record to file or send a termination statement as required by AS

45.29.513(a)

or (c);

fails to comply with AS

45.29.616(b)(1)

and whose failure is part of a pattern, or consistent with a practice, of noncompliance; or

fails to comply with AS

45.29.616(b)(2)

.

A debtor or consumer obligor may recover damages under (b) of this section and, in addition, $500 in each case from a person who, without reasonable cause, fails to comply with a request under AS

45.29.210

. A recipient of a request under AS

45.29.210

who never claimed an interest in the collateral or obligations that are the subject of a request under that section has a reasonable excuse for failure to comply with the request within the meaning of this subsection.

If a secured party fails to comply with a request regarding a list of collateral or a statement of account under AS

45.29.210

, the secured party may claim a security interest only as shown on the list or statement included in the request as against a person who is reasonably misled by the failure.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.626.
Action in which deficiency or surplus is in issue.

In an action arising from a transaction, other than a consumer transaction, in which the amount of a deficiency or surplus is in issue, the following rules apply:

a secured party need not prove compliance with the provisions of AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance unless the debtor or secondary obligor places the secured party’s compliance in issue;

if the secured party’s compliance is placed in issue, the secured party has the burden of establishing that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance was conducted in compliance with the provisions of AS

45.29.601

—

45.29.628

;

except as otherwise provided in AS 45.29.628, if a secured party fails to prove that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance was conducted in compliance with the provisions of AS 45.29.601 — 45.29.628 relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance, the liability of a debtor or secondary obligor for a deficiency is limited to an amount by which the sum of the secured obligation, expenses, and attorney fees exceeds the greater of

the proceeds of the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance; or

the amount of proceeds that would have been realized had the noncomplying secured party proceeded in compliance with the provisions of AS 45.29.601 — 45.29.628 relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance;

for purposes of (3)(B) of this subsection, the amount of proceeds that would have been realized is equal to the sum of the secured obligation, expenses, and attorney fees unless the secured party proves that the amount is less than that sum;

if a deficiency or surplus is calculated under AS

45.29.615(f)

, the debtor or obligor has the burden of establishing that the amount of proceeds of the disposition is significantly below the range of prices that a complying disposition to a person other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor would have brought.

The limitation of the rules in (a) of this section to transactions other than consumer transactions is intended to leave to the court the determination of the proper rules in consumer transactions. The court may not infer from that limitation the nature of the proper rule in consumer transactions and may continue to apply established approaches.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For the effect of (a)(3) and (4) of this section on Rule 79, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see sec. 32, ch. 113, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts.

Sec. 45.29.627.
Determination of whether conduct was commercially reasonable.

The fact that a greater amount could have been obtained by a collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance at a different time or in a different method from that selected by the secured party is not of itself sufficient to preclude the secured party from establishing that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance was made in a commercially reasonable manner.

A disposition of collateral is made in a commercially reasonable manner if the disposition is made

in the usual manner on any recognized market;

at the price current in any recognized market at the time of the disposition; or

otherwise in conformity with reasonable commercial practices among dealers in the type of property that was the subject of the disposition.

A collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance is commercially reasonable if it has been approved

in a judicial proceeding;

by a bona fide creditors’ committee;

by a representative of creditors; or

by an assignee for the benefit of creditors.

Approval under (c) of this section need not be obtained, and lack of approval does not mean that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance is not commercially reasonable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.628.
Nonliability and limitation on liability of secured party; liability of secondary obligor.

Unless a secured party knows that a person is a debtor or obligor, knows the identity of the person, and knows how to communicate with the person,

the secured party is not liable to the person, or to a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against the person, for failure to comply with this chapter; and

the secured party’s failure to comply with this chapter does not affect the liability of the person for a deficiency.

A secured party is not liable because of its status as secured party

to a person who is a debtor or obligor unless the secured party knows

that the person is a debtor or obligor;

the identity of the person; and

how to communicate with the person; or

to a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against a person unless the secured party knows

that the person is a debtor; and

the identity of the person.

A secured party is not liable to a person, and a person’s liability for a deficiency is not affected, because of an act or omission arising out of the secured party’s reasonable belief that a transaction is not a consumer goods transaction or a consumer transaction or that goods are not consumer goods if the secured party’s belief is based on its reasonable reliance on

a debtor’s representation concerning the purpose for which collateral was to be used, acquired, or held; or

an obligor’s representation concerning the purpose for which a secured obligation was incurred.

A secured party is not liable to a person under AS

45.29.625(c)(2)

for its failure to comply with AS

45.29.616

.

A secured party is not liable under AS

45.29.625(c)(2)

more than once with respect to any one secured obligation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)